Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,138
Certificate; term; renewal.

Certificates shall expire two years from the date of issuance and shall be renewed by the director if the applicant has met minimum continuing education requirements and if other provisions of section 81-15,136 do not apply. Operators shall be given sixty days' notice prior to expiration of their certificates and shall have a ninety-day period after such expiration to renew their certificates.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 11.